Utah statutes.
32B-1-506.   Compliance -- Administrative enforcement.

(1)  A retail licensee, a permittee, and staff of a licensee or permittee shall comply with this part.

(2)  Failure to comply with this part may result in a disciplinary proceeding pursuant to Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(a)  a licensee or permittee;

(b)  staff of the licensee or permittee;

(c)  both a licensee and staff of the licensee; or

(d)  both a permittee and staff of the permittee.

